Massachusetts, session 194th, H236.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 51A of Chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking out subsection (k) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-  
(k) A mandated reporter who is professionally licensed by the commonwealth shall 
complete training at least every two years to recognize and report suspected child abuse or 
neglect. The training shall have a curriculum that has been approved by the Office of the Child 
Advocate.    
SECTION 2: Section 5 of Chapter 18C of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
adding the following subsection:-  
(i) The child advocate shall be responsible for approving curricula for mandated reporter 
trainings in accordance with M.G.L. c. 119 § 51A(k). Such curricula shall include, but not be 
limited to, recognition of the signs of child neglect or abuse and related reporting requirements, 
bias and cultural considerations in reporting, information on how to address concerns with 

of 2 13 families and children when those concerns do not rise to the level of requiring a maltreatment 
report, information about connecting families with needed supports and resources and how to 
understand what qualifies as neglect.